Missouri, session 2026, SB1019.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 96.192, 96.196, and 206.110, RSMo,
and section 192.026 as truly agreed to and finally passed by
senate substitute for senate committee substitute for house
committee substitute for house bill no. 2372, one hundred third
general assembly, second regular session, are repealed and five
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
96.192, 96.196, 192.026, 206.110, and 206.158, to read as
follows:
96.192. 1. The board of trustees of any hospital
authorized under subsection 2 of this section, and
established and organized under the provisions of sections
96.150 to 96.229[,]:
(1) May invest up to [twenty-five] fifty percent of
the hospital's "available funds", defined in this section as
funds not required for immediate disbursement in obligations
or for the operation of the hospital [in any United States
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

HCS SB 1019 2
investment grade fixed income funds or any diversified stock
funds, or both.], into:
(a) Any mutual funds that invest in stocks, bonds, or
real estate, or any combination thereof;
(b) Bonds that have:
a. One of the five highest long-term ratings or the
highest short-term rating issued by a nationally recognized
rating agency; and
b. A final maturity of ten years or less;
(c) Money market investments; or
(d) Any combination of investments described in
paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subdivision; and
(2) Shall invest the remaining percentage of any
available funds not invested as allowed under subdivision
(1) of this subsection into any investment in which the
state treasurer is allowed to invest.
2. The provisions of this section shall only apply if
the hospital:
(1) Receives less than [one] three percent of its
annual revenues from municipal, county, or state taxes; and
(2) Receives less than [one] three percent of its
annual revenue from appropriated funds from the municipality
in which such hospital is located.
96.196. 1. A hospital organized under this chapter
may purchase, operate or lease, as lessor or lessee, related
facilities or engage in health care activities, except in
counties of the third or fourth classification (other than
the county in which the hospital is located) where there
already exists a hospital organized pursuant to this chapter
[and chapter 205 or 206]; provided, however, that this
exception shall not prohibit the continuation of existing
activities otherwise allowed by law.

HCS SB 1019 3
2. If a hospital organized pursuant to this chapter
accepts appropriated funds from the city during the twelve
months immediately preceding the date that the hospital
purchases, operates or leases its first related facility
outside the city boundaries or engages in its first health
care activity outside the city boundaries, the governing
body of the city shall approve the hospital's plan for such
purchase, operation or lease prior to implementation of the
plan.
[192.026. 1. Sections 103.190 and 192.026
to 192.029 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Missouri Lyme Disease Eradication Act".
2. As used in sections 103.190 and 192.026
to 192.029, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of health
and senior services;
(2) "Lyme disease", a condition caused by
an infection of the bacterium Borrelia
burgdorferi, Borrelia mayonii, Borrelia afzelii,
Borrelia garinii, Borrelia valaisiana, Borrelia
lusitaniae, Bartonella, Babesia, Ehrlichia, or
related species, transmitted to humans through
the bite of infected blacklegged ticks (Ixodes
scapularis) or other ticks, as diagnosed by the
two-tier serologic testing recommended by the
federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention (CDC) or by a similar blood test
ordered by a treating health care provider or by
clinical evaluation;
(3) "Medically necessary", health care
services or products that a treating health care
provider exercising prudent clinical judgment
would provide to a patient for the purpose of
preventing, evaluating, diagnosing, or treating
an illness, injury, disease, or symptoms of
such, and that are:
(a) Clinically appropriate in terms of
type, frequency, extent, site, and duration for
the specific circumstances; and

HCS SB 1019 4
(b) Not primarily for the mere convenience
of the patient, health care provider, or as
determined by the provider based on the
patient's specific circumstances;
(4) "Posttreatment Lyme disease syndrome",
a condition characterized by persistent
symptoms, including, but not limited to,
fatigue, pain, respiratory impairment,
neurological impairment, or other cognitive
impairment following standard antibiotic or
other treatment for Lyme disease.
3. Health care providers, laboratories,
and local health departments shall report to the
department all confirmed or suspected cases of
Lyme disease within seven days of diagnosis
using standardized surveillance case definitions
developed by the CDC. Any patient who receives
a positive or suspected diagnosis of Lyme
disease shall be given the option to opt in to
having their identifiable information shared
with the department, local public health
officials, or the CDC.
4. The department shall compile an annual
report on the incidence and prevalence of Lyme
disease in Missouri, including, but not limited
to, demographic data, geographic distribution,
treatment outcomes, and barriers to care. The
department shall submit the report to the CDC
and the general assembly and make such report
available to the public on the department's
website by no later than December thirty-first
of each year.
5. The department shall collaborate with
the University of Missouri or any public four-
year institution of higher education to
integrate Lyme disease surveillance data into
existing tick-borne disease monitoring programs.
6. Any information collected or reported
under this section shall be done in a manner
that protects individually identifiable or
potentially identifiable information and that is
consistent with state and federal privacy laws.
7. The department may promulgate any rules
and regulations necessary to implement the

HCS SB 1019 5
provisions of sections 192.026 to 192.028. Any
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid
and void.]
192.026. 1. Sections 103.190 and 192.026 to 192.029
shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri Lyme
Disease Eradication Act".
2. As used in sections 103.190 and 192.026 to 192.029,
the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of health and senior
services;
(2) "Lyme disease", a condition caused by an infection
of the bacterium Borrelia burgdorferi, Borrelia mayonii,
Borrelia afzelii, Borrelia garinii, Borrelia valaisiana, or
Borrelia lusitaniae, transmitted to humans through the bite
of infected blacklegged ticks (Ixodes scapularis) or other
ticks, as defined by the national reporting case definition
and posted by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
National Notifiable Diseases Surveillance System;
(3) "Medically necessary", health care services or
products that a treating health care provider exercising
prudent clinical judgment would provide to a patient for the
purpose of preventing, evaluating, diagnosing, or treating

HCS SB 1019 6
an illness, injury, disease, or symptoms of such, and that
are:
(a) Clinically appropriate in terms of type,
frequency, extent, site, and duration for the specific
circumstances; and
(b) Not primarily for the mere convenience of the
patient, health care provider, or as determined by the
provider based on the patient's specific circumstances;
(4) "Posttreatment Lyme disease syndrome", a condition
characterized by persistent symptoms, including, but not
limited to, fatigue, pain, respiratory impairment,
neurological impairment, or other cognitive impairment
following standard antibiotic or other treatment for Lyme
disease.
3. Health care providers, laboratories, and local
health departments shall report to the department all
confirmed or suspected cases of Lyme disease within three
days of diagnosis using standardized surveillance case
definitions developed by the CDC. Any patient who receives
a positive or suspected diagnosis of Lyme disease shall be
given the option to opt in to having their identifiable
information shared with the department, local public health
officials, or the CDC.
4. The department shall compile an annual report on
the incidence and prevalence of Lyme disease in Missouri,
including, but not limited to, demographic data, geographic
distribution, treatment outcomes, and barriers to care. The
department shall submit the report to the CDC and the
general assembly and make such report available to the
public on the department's website by no later than December
thirty-first of each year.

HCS SB 1019 7
5. The department shall collaborate with the
University of Missouri or any public four-year institution
of higher education to integrate Lyme disease surveillance
data into existing tick-borne disease monitoring programs.
6. Any information collected or reported under this
section shall be done in a manner that protects individually
identifiable or potentially identifiable information and
that is consistent with state and federal privacy laws.
7. The department may promulgate any rules and
regulations necessary to implement the provisions of
sections 192.026 to 192.028. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
206.110. 1. A hospital district, both within and
outside such district, except in counties of the third or
fourth classification (other than within the district
boundaries) where there already exists a hospital organized
pursuant to [chapters 96, 205 or] this chapter; provided,
however, that this exception shall not prohibit the
continuation or expansion of existing activities otherwise
allowed by law, shall have and exercise the following
governmental powers, and all other powers incidental,

HCS SB 1019 8
necessary, convenient or desirable to carry out and
effectuate the express powers:
(1) To establish and maintain a hospital or hospitals
and hospital facilities, and to construct, acquire, develop,
expand, extend and improve any such hospital or hospital
facility including medical office buildings to provide
offices for rental to physicians and dentists on the
district hospital's medical or dental staff, and the
providing of sites therefor, including offstreet parking
space for motor vehicles;
(2) To acquire land in fee simple, rights in land and
easements upon, over or across land and leasehold interest
in land and tangible and intangible personal property used
or useful for the location, establishment, maintenance,
development, expansion, extension or improvement of any
hospital or hospital facility. The acquisition may be by
dedication, purchase, gift, agreement, lease, use or adverse
possession or by condemnation;
(3) To operate, maintain and manage a hospital and
hospital facilities, and to make and enter into contracts,
for the use, operation or management of a hospital or
hospital facilities; to engage in health care activities;
and to make and enter into leases of equipment and real
property, a hospital or hospital facilities, as lessor or
lessee, regardless of the duration of such lease; and to
provide rules and regulations for the operation, management
or use of a hospital or hospital facilities. Any agreement
entered into pursuant to this subsection pertaining to the
lease of the hospital shall have a definite termination date
as negotiated by the parties, but this shall not preclude
the trustees from entering into a renewal of the agreement
with the same or other parties pertaining to the same or

HCS SB 1019 9
other subjects upon such terms and conditions as the parties
may agree;
(4) To fix, charge and collect reasonable fees and
compensation for the use or occupancy of the hospital or any
part thereof, or any hospital facility, and for nursing
care, medicine, attendance, or other services furnished by
the hospital or hospital facilities, according to the rules
and regulations prescribed by the board from time to time;
(5) To borrow money and to issue bonds, notes,
certificates, or other evidences of indebtedness for the
purpose of accomplishing any of its corporate purposes,
subject to compliance with any condition or limitation set
forth in this chapter or otherwise provided by the
Constitution of the state of Missouri;
(6) To employ or enter into contracts for the
employment of any person, firm, or corporation, and for
professional services, necessary or desirable for the
accomplishment of the corporate objects of the district or
the proper administration, management, protection or control
of its property;
(7) To maintain the hospital for the benefit of the
inhabitants of the area comprising the district who are
sick, injured, or maimed regardless of race, creed or color,
and to adopt such reasonable rules and regulations as may be
necessary to render the use of the hospital of the greatest
benefit to the greatest number; to exclude from the use of
the hospital all persons who willfully disregard any of the
rules and regulations so established; to extend the
privileges and use of the hospital to persons residing
outside the area of the district upon such terms and
conditions as the board of directors prescribes by its rules
and regulations;

HCS SB 1019 10
(8) To police its property and to exercise police
powers in respect thereto or in respect to the enforcement
of any rule or regulation provided by the ordinances of the
district and to employ and commission police officers and
other qualified persons to enforce the same;
(9) To lease to or allow for any institution of higher
education to use or occupy the hospital, any real estate or
facility owned or leased by the district or any part thereof
for the purpose of health care-related and general education
or training.
2. The use of any hospital or hospital facility of a
district shall be subject to the reasonable regulation and
control of the district and upon such reasonable terms and
conditions as shall be established by its board of directors.
3. A regulatory ordinance of a district adopted under
any provision of this section may provide for a suspension
or revocation of any rights or privileges within the control
of the district for a violation of any such regulatory
ordinance.
4. Nothing in this section or in other provisions of
this chapter shall be construed to authorize the district or
board to establish or enforce any regulation or rule in
respect to hospitalization or the operation or maintenance
of such hospital or any hospital facilities within its
jurisdiction which is in conflict with any federal or state
law or regulation applicable to the same subject matter.
206.158. 1. The board of directors of any hospital
district authorized under subsection 2 of this section, and
established and organized under the provisions of this
chapter:
(1) May invest up to fifty percent of its "available
funds", defined in this section as funds not required for

HCS SB 1019 11
immediate disbursement in obligations or for the operation
of the hospital district, into:
(a) Any mutual funds that invest in stocks, bonds, or
real estate, or any combination thereof;
(b) Bonds that have:
a. One of the five highest long-term ratings or the
highest short-term rating issued by a nationally recognized
rating agency; and
b. A final maturity of ten years or less;
(c) Money market investments; or
(d) Any combination of investments described in
paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subdivision; and
(2) Shall invest the remaining percentage of any
available funds not invested as allowed under subdivision
(1) of this subsection into any investment in which the
state treasurer is allowed to invest.
2. The provisions of this section shall apply only if
the hospital district receives less than three percent of
its annual revenues from hospital district or state taxes.
✓